Utah statutes.
78B-16-110.   Duration of abduction prevention order.
An abduction prevention order remains in effect until the earliest of:
(1)  the time stated in the order;
(2)  the emancipation of the child;
(3)  the child's attaining 18 years of age; or
(4)  the time the order is modified, revoked, vacated, or superseded by a
court with jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203.
